Illinois, session 104th, SB1872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Single-Use Plastic Bag Reduction Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 8Agency. 9    "Consumer" means any person who makes a purchase at 10retail. 11    "Person" means an individual, natural person, public or 12private corporation, government, partnership, unincorporated 13association, or other entity. 14    "Plastic" means an organic or petroleum derived synthetic 15or a semisynthetic solid material synthesized by the 16polymerization of organic substances that is moldable into 17various rigid and flexible forms, and to which additives or 18other substances may have been added. "Plastic" does not 19include natural polymers that have not been chemically 20modified.21    "Primarily engaged" means having sales of ready-to-eat 22food for immediate consumption comprising at least 51% of the 23total sales, excluding the sale of liquor.   SB1872- 2 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1    "Recycled paper bag" means a paper bag that: 2        (1) is 100% recyclable; and 3        (2) contains at least 40% post-consumer recycled 4    material. 5    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged 6in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption. 7    "Retail mercantile establishment" means a business that 8makes sales at retail and generates occupation or use tax 9revenue. "Retail mercantile establishment" does not include 10restaurant or small retail mercantile establishment. 11    "Reusable bag" means a bag with threaded stitched handles 12that: 13        (1) is designed and manufactured for multiple uses; 14        (2) can carry 22 pounds of a distance of 175 feet; and 15        (3) is made of cloth, fiber, or other fabric or 16    recycled material that is machine washable and can be 17    cleaned and disinfected regularly. 18    "Single-use checkout bag" means a single-use plastic bag 19that is provided by a retail mercantile establishment at the 20checkout, cash register, or point of sale to a consumer for the 21purpose of transporting goods out of the retail mercantile 22establishment and that is not a recycled paper bag or reusable 23bag. The term "Single-use checkout bag" does not include a bag 24that is: 25        (1) used to package bulk items such as fruit, 26    vegetables, nuts, grains, or candy;   SB1872- 3 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1        (2) used for greeting cards, balloons, or small 2    hardware items such as nails and bolts; 3        (3) used to contain or wrap frozen foods, meat, or 4    fish whether prepackaged or not; 5        (4) used to contain or wrap flowers or potted plants 6    or other items where dampness may be a problem; 7        (5) used to contain unwrapped prepared foods or bakery 8    goods; 9        (6) used to contain prescription drugs; 10        (7) sold in packages containing multiple bags intended 11    for use as garbage bags, pet waste bags or yard waste bags; 12        (8) brought to a store by the consumer for their own 13    use or to carry away from the store goods that are not 14    placed in a bag provided by the store; 15        (9) provided by a dine-in or take-out restaurant to 16    contain food or drink purchased by the restaurant's 17    consumers; 18        (10) plastic liners that are permanently affixed, or 19    designed and intended to be permanently affixed, to the 20    inside of a particular bag; 21        (11) a newspaper bag, door-hanger bag, laundry 22    cleaning bag, garment bag; or 23        (12) used for an online or digital orders where an 24    employee of the retail mercantile establishment packages 25    the goods for curbside pick-up or delivery. 26    "Small retail mercantile establishment" means a retail   SB1872- 4 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1mercantile establishment that has 12 or fewer locations in the 2State, and is not part of a franchise, corporation, or 3partnership; or is a retailer as defined by the Motor Fuel and 4Petroleum Standards Act and is less than 5,000 square feet. 5    Section 10. Single-use checkout bag prohibition. Starting 6July 1, 2026, a retail mercantile establishment shall not 7offer a single-use checkout bag to consumers at the point of 8sale or otherwise make a single-use checkout bag available to 9consumers. A retail mercantile establishment may offer a 10recycled paper bag or reusable bag to consumers. 11    Section 15. Recycled paper bag fees. 12    (a) If a retail mercantile establishment offers a recycled 13paper bag to consumers, the retail mercantile establishment 14shall charge a fee of at least $0.10 per recycled paper bag 15offered to a consumer. 16    (b) All amounts collected pursuant to this Section are 17retained by the retail mercantile establishment and may be 18used for any lawful purpose. 19    (c) A retail mercantile establishment may not rebate or 20otherwise reimburse a customer any portion of the fee charged 21pursuant to this Section. 22    (d) The fee imposed under this Section does not apply to 23recycled paper bags that are used to carry items purchased 24pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,   SB1872- 5 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1Women Infants, and Children program, or a similar governmental 2food assistance program. Any final purchase price that 3includes a recycled paper bag fee must be excluded from the 4amount upon which any fee is charged the retail mercantile 5establishment by any person when a consumer uses a card, note, 6plate, coupon book, credit, or any other similar device to 7purchase the paper bag. 8    Section 20. Education material and signage. 9    (a) Every retail mercantile establishment subject to the 10single-use checkout bag prohibition and collection of the 11recycled paper bag fee shall conspicuously display a sign in a 12location outside or inside of the establishment, viewable by 13customers, alerting customers to the state's single-use 14checkout bag prohibition and recycled paper bag fee. 15    (b) The Agency shall develop educational and promotional 16material, including a sign that complies with subsection (a) 17of this section, regarding the state's single-use checkout bag 18prohibition and recycled paper bag fee. The Agency shall make 19the material available on the Agency's website for use by 20retail mercantile establishments that are subject to the 21requirements of this Act. 22    Section 25. Enforcement. 23    (a) The Agency may cause periodic inspections to be made 24of retailers in order to determine compliance with this Act.   SB1872- 6 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1The Agency shall investigate complaints received concerning 2violations of this Act. 3    (b) If the Agency finds that any person has committed a 4violation of any provision of this Act, the Agency shall issue 5a warning to the person. Any person who commits a second 6violation within 12 months after the issuance of the warning 7shall be subject to a civil penalty, issued by the Agency, of 8up to $100. Any further violations committed within 12 months 9of the most recent violation after the second or subsequent 10violation shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than 11$500. 12    (c) Any penalties collected under this Section shall be 13deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be 14used in accordance with the provisions of the Environmental 15Protection Trust Fund Act. 16    Section 30. Municipal plastic bag audits; home rule. The 17power to audit taxes or fees on the collection, remittance, 18and payment of any taxes on plastic bags, however defined, is 19an exclusive power and function of the State. A municipality, 20including a home rule municipality, may not conduct a 21financial audit, with respect to the provision of plastic 22bags, of any person that provides a plastic bag to a consumer. 23This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 24functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 25the Illinois Constitution.    SB1872- 7 -LRB104 08580 BDA 18632 b1    Section 35. Regulation of checkout bags; home rule. A 2municipality or county, including a home rule unit, may not 3regulate in any manner the use, disposition, content, 4taxation, or sale of any checkout bag, however defined, that 5is provided by a retail mercantile establishment at the 6checkout, cash register, point of sale, or other point of 7departure to a consumer for the purpose of transporting goods 8out of the retail mercantile establishment. This Section is a 9denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 10subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 11Constitution.